Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-406
Books; loans to libraries.

Any books, collection of books or other property of the Nebraska Library Commission may be loaned to any library, under such rules for the safekeeping, preservation, care, handling and management of the same as may be fixed by the Nebraska Library Commission.

Laws 1935, c. 115, § 6, p. 371;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 51-506;

R.S.1943, § 51-406;

Laws 1972, LB 1033, § 10.